Utah statutes.
63A-14-203.   Independent Executive Branch Ethics Commission -- Meetings -- Annual summary report -- Staff.

(1)  The commission shall meet for the purpose of reviewing an ethics complaint when:

(a)  except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, called to meet at the discretion of the chair; or

(b)  called to meet by a majority vote of the commission.

(2) (a)  A majority of the commission is a quorum.

(b)  A majority vote of a quorum present constitutes the action of the commission.

(3) (a)  The commission shall prepare an annual summary data report that contains:

(i)  a general description of the activities of the commission during the past year;

(ii)  the number of ethics complaints filed with the commission;

(iii)  the number of ethics complaints reviewed by the commission;

(iv)  a summary description of ethics complaints that formed the basis for a commission finding that an allegation in a complaint has merit; and

(v)  an accounting of the commission's budget and expenditures.

(b)  The commission shall submit the summary data report to the Legislative Management Committee before December 1 each year.

(c)  The summary data report is a public record.

(4) (a)  The commission may employ staff at a level that is reasonable to assist the commission in performing the commission's duties as established in this chapter.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), staff for the commission may not perform services for any other person in state government.

(c)  A person employed as staff for the commission may be the same person employed as staff for the Independent Legislative Ethics Commission, if the staff ensures that proper protections are in place to preserve the confidentiality to both bodies and to avoid a conflict of interest.

(5)  Except as expressly otherwise provided in this chapter, all meetings held under this chapter are closed to the public.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

